Vermont, session 2025-2026, H612.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. chapter 69A is added to read:
CHAPTER 69A. VERMONT RACKETEER INFLUENCED AND
CORRUPT ORGANIZATIONS ACT
§ 3121. SHORT TITLE
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Vermont Racketeer
Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act.”
§ 3122. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that a severe problem is posed in this State
by the increasing sophistication of various criminal elements and the extent to
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 2 of 13
which the State and its citizens are harmed as a result of the activities of these
elements.
(b) The intent of this chapter is to impose sanctions against those who
violate this chapter and to provide compensation to persons injured or
aggrieved by such violations. It is not the intent of the General Assembly that
isolated incidents of misdemeanor conduct or acts of civil disobedience be
prosecuted under this chapter. This chapter shall apply to an interrelated
pattern of criminal activity motivated by or the effect of which is pecuniary
gain or economic or physical threat or injury. This chapter shall be liberally
construed to effectuate the remedial purposes embodied in its operative
provisions.
§ 3123. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Civil forfeiture proceeding” means the process set forth in 18
V.S.A. §§ 4242–4248, which shall apply to all property seized pursuant to this
chapter.
(2) “Criminal proceeding” means any proceeding commenced in the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court by the Attorney General or a State’s
Attorney under any provision of this chapter.
(3) “Enterprise” means any person, sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, business trust, union chartered under the laws of this State, or
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 3 of 13
other legal entity; or any unchartered union, association, or group of
individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity; and it includes illicit
as well as licit enterprises and governmental as well as other entities.
(4) “Pattern of racketeering activity” means:
(A) engaging in at least two acts of racketeering activity in
furtherance of one or more incidents, schemes, or transactions that have the
same or similar intents, results, accomplices, victims, or methods of
commission or otherwise are interrelated by distinguishing characteristics and
are not isolated incidents, provided at least one of such acts occurred after July
1, 1980, and that the last of such acts occurred within four years, excluding any
periods of imprisonment, after the commission of a prior act of racketeering
activity; or
(B) engaging in any one or more acts of domestic terrorism as
described in section 3521 of this title or any criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy related thereto.
(5)(A) “Racketeering activity” means to commit, to attempt to commit,
or to solicit, coerce, or intimidate another person to commit any crime that is
chargeable by indictment under the laws of this State involving:
(i) unlawful distillation, manufacture, sale, and transportation of
alcoholic beverages in violation of 7 V.S.A. chapter 21;
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 4 of 13
(ii) records and reports of currency transactions in violation of
8 V.S.A. chapter 79;
(iii) the Vermont Uniform Securities Act (2002) in violation of
9 V.S.A. chapter 150;
(iv) homicide in violation of chapter 53 of this title;
(v) assaults and related offenses in violation of chapter 19 of this
title;
(vi) kidnapping, false imprisonment, and related offenses in
violation of chapter 55 of this title;
(vii) prostitution, keeping a place of prostitution, soliciting,
procuring, inducing, enticing, compelling, or transporting a person for the
purpose of prostitution in violation of chapter 59, subchapter 2 of this title;
(viii) burglary in violation of chapter 23 of this title;
(ix) assault and robbery in violation of section 608 of this title;
(x) arson and burning in violation of chapter 11 of this title;
(xi) bombs, explosives, and destructive devices in violation of
chapter 37 of this title;
(xii) larceny and embezzlement in violation of chapter 57 of this
title;
(xiii) robbery in violation of section 608 of this title;
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 5 of 13
(xiv) forgery and counterfeiting in any degree in violation of
chapter 43 of this title;
(xv) identity theft in violation of section 2030 of this title;
(xvi) bribery in violation of chapter 21 of this title;
(xvii) false alarms and reports in violation of chapter 41 of this
title;
(xviii) impersonating a public officer or employee in violation of
section 3002 of this title;
(xix) obstruction of justice in violation of section 3015 of this title;
(xx) perjury and other related offenses in violation of chapter 65
of this title;
(xxi) domestic terrorism in violation of section 3521 of this title;
(xxii) dangerous weapons in violation of chapter 85 of this title;
(xxiii) commercial gambling in violation of chapter 51 this title;
(xxiv) distributing obscene materials in violation of chapter 63 of
this title;
(xxv) the unlawful manufacture, distribution, dispensing, sale, or
possession of noncontrolled drugs in violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4228 or
18 V.S.A §§ 4231–4235a and related offenses in 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1;
(xxvi) insurance fraud in violation of section 2031 of this title;
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 6 of 13
(xxvii) certain felonies involving certificates of title, security
interest, or liens in violation of chapter 49 of this title;
(xxviii) defacing of identifying numbers in violation of 23 V.S.A.
§ 1703;
(xxix) possession of a motor vehicle with serial or motor numbers
defaced in violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1701;
(xxx) abuse, neglect, and exploitation of vulnerable adults in
violation of chapter 28 of this title; or
(xxxi) offenses enumerated in 13 V.S.A. § 364.
(B) “Racketeering activity” also means any act or threat involving
murder, kidnapping, gambling, arson, robbery, theft, receipt of stolen property,
bribery, extortion, obstruction of justice, dealing in narcotic or dangerous
drugs, or dealing in securities that is chargeable under the laws of the United
States, any territory of the United States, or any state and that is punishable by
imprisonment for more than one year.
(C) “Racketeering activity” also means any conduct defined as
“racketeering activity” under 18 U.S.C. § 1961(1), any violation of 18 U.S.C.
§ 1028, or any violation of 31 U.S.C. §§ 5311–5330.
(6) “Real property” means any real property situated in this State or any
interest in such real property, including any lease of or mortgage upon such
real property.
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 7 of 13
§ 3124. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person, through a pattern of racketeering
activity or proceeds derived from racketeering activity, to acquire or maintain,
directly or indirectly, any interest in or control of any enterprise, real property,
or personal property of any nature, including money.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any person employed by or associated with any
enterprise to conduct or participate in, directly or indirectly, such enterprise
through a pattern of racketeering activity.
(c) It shall be unlawful for any person to conspire or endeavor to violate
any of the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. A person violates
this subsection when:
(1) the person, together with one or more persons, conspires to violate
any of the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section and any one or
more of such persons commits any overt act to affect the object of the
conspiracy; or
(2) the person endeavors to violate any of the provisions of subsection
(a) or (b) of this section and commits any overt act to affect the object of the
endeavor.
§ 3125. CRIMINAL PENALTIES
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in law, a person convicted of the
offense of engaging in activity in violation of section 3124 of this title shall be
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 8 of 13
imprisoned not more than 20 years or fined not more than $25,000.00 or three
times the amount of any pecuniary value gained by the person from the
violation, or both. The court shall hold a hearing to determine the amount of
the fine.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “pecuniary value” means:
(1) anything of value in the form of money, a negotiable instrument, a
commercial interest, or anything else, the primary significance of which is
economic advantage; or
(2) any other property or service that has a value in excess of $100.00.
§ 3126. CIVIL REMEDIES
(a) Any court in the Civil Division of the Superior Court, after making due
provisions for the rights of innocent persons, may enjoin violations of section
3124 of this title by issuing appropriate orders and judgments, including:
(1) ordering any defendant to divest themselves of any interest in any
enterprise, real property, or personal property;
(2) imposing reasonable restrictions upon the future activities or
investments of any defendant, including prohibiting any defendant from
engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise in which the defendant
was engaged in violation of section 3124 of this title;
(3) ordering the dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise;
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 9 of 13
(4) ordering the suspension or revocation of any license, permit, or prior
approval granted to any enterprise by any agency of the State; or
(5) ordering the forfeiture of the charter of a corporation organized
under the laws of this State or the revocation of a certificate authorizing a
foreign corporation to conduct business within this State upon a finding that
the board of directors or a managerial agent acting on behalf of the
corporation, in conducting affairs of the corporation, has authorized or engaged
in conduct in violation of section 3124 of this title and that, for the prevention
of future criminal activity, the public interest requires that the charter of the
corporation be forfeited and that the corporation be dissolved or the certificate
be revoked.
(b) Any aggrieved person or the State may institute a civil action under
subsection (a) of this section. In the civil action, relief shall be granted in
conformity with the principles that govern the granting of injunctive relief
from threatened loss or damage in other civil cases, provided that no showing
of special or irreparable damage to the person shall have to be made. Upon the
execution of proper bond against damages for an injunction improvidently
granted and a showing of immediate danger of significant loss or damage, a
temporary restraining order and a preliminary injunction may be issued in any
such action before a final determination on the merits.
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 10 of 13
(c) Any person who is injured by reason of any violation of section 3124 of
this title shall have a cause of action for three times the actual damages
sustained and, where appropriate, punitive damages. Such person shall also
recover attorney’s fees in the trial and appellate courts and the costs of
investigation and litigation reasonably incurred. The defendant or any injured
person may demand a trial by jury in any civil action brought pursuant to this
section.
(d) Any injured person shall have a right or claim to forfeited property or to
the proceeds derived therefrom.
(e) A conviction in any criminal proceeding shall estop the defendant in
any subsequent civil action or civil forfeiture proceeding under this chapter as
to all matters proved in the criminal proceeding.
§ 3127. CIVIL FORFEITURE PROCEEDINGS
(a) All property of every kind used or intended for use in the course of,
derived from, or realized through a pattern of racketeering activity shall be
subject to forfeiture to the State. The Attorney General and any State’s
Attorney shall be specifically authorized to commence any civil forfeiture
proceeding under this chapter in matters arising under this chapter.
(b) Any property subject to forfeiture pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section and any proceeds are declared to be contraband and no person shall
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 11 of 13
have a property right in them, and they shall be forfeited in accordance with
the procedure set forth in 18 V.S.A. §§ 4242–4248.
§ 3128. LIMITATION OF TIME FOR COMMENCEMENT OF ACTIONS
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a criminal proceeding or civil
action brought pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within five years
after the conduct in violation of this chapter terminates. If the State brings a
criminal charge or commences a civil forfeiture proceeding pursuant to this
chapter, the tolling of the period of limitations with respect to any cause of
action arising under section 3124 or 3127 of this title that is based upon any
matter complained of in such criminal proceeding or civil forfeiture proceeding
by the State shall be suspended during the pendency of the proceedings and for
two years thereafter.
§ 3129. APPLICATION OF CIVIL REMEDIES
The application of a civil remedy under this chapter shall not preclude the
application of any other remedy, civil or criminal, under this chapter or any
other provision of law. Civil remedies under this chapter are supplemental and
not mutually exclusive.
§ 3130. RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT OF JUDGMENTS OF
OTHER STATES; RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER
STATES
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 12 of 13
(a) A valid judgment rendered by a court of a jurisdiction having a law
substantially similar to this chapter shall be recognized and enforced by the
courts of this State to the extent that a judgment rendered by a court of this
State pursuant to this chapter would be enforced in the other jurisdiction.
(b) The Attorney General shall be authorized to enter into reciprocal
agreements with the attorney general or chief prosecuting attorney of any
jurisdiction having a law substantially similar to this chapter so as to further
the purposes of this chapter.
§ 3131. VENUE
For purposes of this chapter, the crime shall be considered to have been
committed in any county in which an incident of racketeering occurred or in
which an interest or control of an enterprise or real or personal property is
acquired or maintained.
§ 3132. CASES OF SPECIAL IMPORTANCE
In any civil action or civil forfeiture proceeding brought pursuant to this
chapter, the State may file with the clerk of the court a certificate stating that
the case is of special public importance. A copy of such certificate shall be
furnished immediately by the clerk to the chief judge or, in the judge’s
absence, the presiding chief judge of the court in which the civil action or civil
forfeiture proceeding is pending. Upon receipt of the certificate, the judge
shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine the civil action or
VT LEG #385601 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.612
2026 Page 13 of 13
civil forfeiture proceeding. The judge designated shall promptly assign the
civil action or civil forfeiture proceeding for hearing, participate in the
hearings and determination, and cause such civil action or civil forfeiture
proceeding to be expedited.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385601 v.1